Hawaii statutes.
PART II. POWER OF SALE FORECLOSURE PROCESS

Note

Part heading amended by L 2012, c 182, §3(7).

Law Journals and Reviews

Hawai‘i 2000 Report Regarding Lawyers' Opinion Letters in
Mortgage Loan Transactions. 22 UH L. Rev. 347 (2000).

§667-21 Power of sale process. The
power of sale process in this part is an alternative to the
foreclosure by action in part IA. [L 1998, c 122, pt
of §1; am L 2011, c 48, §20; am L 2012, c 182, §15]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next